District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-201

Definition and penalty.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1332, ch. 854, § 874
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 2(d), 41 DCR 1639
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 105(b), 41 DCR 2608
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 3(b), 50 DCR 10996

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-301.
1973 Ed., § 22-301.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(b) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).